Washington statutes.
RCW 36.82.210

Disposition of fines and forfeitures for violations.

All fines and forfeitures collected for violation of any of the provisions of chapters 36.75, and 36.77 to 36.87 RCW, inclusive, when the violation thereof occurred outside of any incorporated city or town shall be distributed and paid into the proper funds for the following purposes: One-half shall be paid into the county road fund of the county in which the violation occurred; one-fourth into the state fund for the support of state parks and parkways; and one-fourth into the highway safety fund: PROVIDED, That all fees, fines, forfeitures and penalties collected or assessed by a district court because of the violation of a state law shall be remitted as provided in chapter 3.62 RCW as now exists or is later amended.

All fines and forfeitures collected for the violation of any of such provisions when the violation thereof occurred inside any incorporated city or town shall be distributed and paid into the proper funds for the following purposes: One-half shall be paid into the city street fund of such incorporated city or town for the construction and maintenance of city streets; one-fourth into the state fund for the support of state parks and parkways; and one-fourth into the highway safety fund: PROVIDED, That all fees, fines, forfeitures and penalties collected or assessed by a district court because of the violation of a state law shall be remitted as provided in chapter 3.62 RCW as now exists or is later amended.

[ 1987 c 202 s 211; 1969 ex.s. c 199 s 21; 1963 c 4 s 36.82.210. Prior: 1949 c 75 s 2; 1937 c 187 s 67; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 6450-67.]

NOTES:

Intent—1987 c 202: See note following RCW 2.04.190.